California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
(1) For engines manufactured before January 1, 1993, a noise level of 90 dB(A) when subjected to the Society of Automotive Engineers Recommended Practice SAE J2005 (Stationary Sound Level Measurement Procedure for Pleasure Motorboats).

(2) For engines manufactured on or after January 1, 1993, a noise level of 88 dB(A) when subjected to the Society of Automotive Engineers Recommended Practice SAE J2005 (Stationary Sound Level Measurement Procedure for Pleasure Motorboats).

(3) A noise level of 75 dB(A) measured as specified in the Society of Automotive Engineers Recommended Practice SAE J1970 (Shoreline Sound Level Measurement Procedure). However, a measurement of noise level that is in compliance with this paragraph does not preclude the conducting of a test of noise levels under paragraph (1) or (2).

(b) A law enforcement officer utilizing a decibel measuring device for the purposes of enforcing this section shall be knowledgeable and proficient in the use of that device.

(c) The department may, by regulation, revise the measurement procedure when deemed necessary to adjust to advances in technology.

(d) This section does not apply to motorized recreational vessels competing under a local public entity or United States Coast Guard permit in a regatta, in a boat race, while on trial runs, or while on official trials for speed records during the time and in the designated area authorized by the permit. In addition, this section does not apply to motorized recreational vessels preparing for a race or regatta if authorized by a permit issued by the local entity having jurisdiction over the area where these preparations occur.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 130, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

654.06.

No person shall sell or offer for sale at retail any internal combustion engine for use on any motorized recreational vessel which, when operated, exceeds the following noise levels:

(a) For engines manufactured on or after January 1, 1974, and before January 1, 1976, a noise level of 86 dbA measured at a distance of 50 feet from the motorized recreational vessel.

(b) For engines manufactured on or after January 1, 1976, and before January 1, 1978, a noise level of 84 dbA measured at a distance of 50 feet from the motorized recreational vessel.

(c) For engines manufactured on or after January 1, 1978, a noise level of 82 dbA measured at a distance of 50 feet from the motorized recreational vessel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 666, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

654.1.

Boating facilities constructed with funds derived from the state shall be required as a condition for the receipt of such funds to provide shoreside facilities for purposes of emptying waste matter holding tanks from vessels in accordance with needs and standards as established by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

654.3.

(a) Each diesel powered vessel operating exclusively in California, engaged in the commercial transport of passengers with the capacity to transport 75 passengers or more, shall use only California diesel fuel formulated as specified in Sections 2281 and 2282 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 502, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Section operative January 1, 2003, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

654.5.

A person who maliciously throws, hurls, or projects an object by manual, mechanical, or other means at a vessel or an occupant of a vessel on any of the waters within or bordering on this state, which act does not constitute a violation of either Section 242 or 594 of the Penal Code, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon first conviction the punishment shall be a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed 30 days, or both that fine and imprisonment. Upon a second conviction, the punishment shall be a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed 90 days, or both that fine and imprisonment. Upon a third or subsequent conviction, the punishment shall be a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or
 imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 32.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

655.

(a) No person shall use any vessel or manipulate water skis, an aquaplane, or a similar device in a reckless or negligent manner so as to endanger the life, limb, or property of any person. The department shall adopt regulations for the use of vessels, water skis, aquaplanes, or similar devices in a manner that will minimize the danger to life, limb, or property consistent with reasonable use of the equipment for the purpose for which it was designed.

(b) No person shall operate any vessel or manipulate water skis, an aquaplane, or a similar device while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, any drug, or the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and any drug.

(c) No person shall operate any recreational vessel or manipulate any water skis, aquaplane, or similar device if the person has an alcohol concentration of 0.08 percent or more in his or her blood.

(d) No person shall operate any vessel other than a recreational vessel if the person has an alcohol concentration of 0.04 percent or more in his or her blood.

(e) No person shall operate any vessel, or manipulate water skis, an aquaplane, or a similar device who is addicted to the use of any drug. This subdivision does not apply to a person who is participating in a narcotic treatment program approved pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 11875) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) No person shall operate any vessel or manipulate water skis, an aquaplane, or a similar device while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, any drug, or under the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and any drug, and while so operating, do any act forbidden by law, or neglect any duty imposed by law in the use of the vessel, water skis, aquaplane, or similar device, which act or neglect proximately causes bodily injury to any person other than himself or herself.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, information, verbal or otherwise, which is obtained from a commissioned, warrant, or petty officer of the United States Coast Guard who directly observed the offense may be used as the sole basis for establishing the necessary reasonable cause for a peace officer of this state to make an arrest pursuant to the United States Constitution, the California Constitution, and Section 836 of the Penal Code for violations of subdivisions (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this section.

(h) In any prosecution under subdivision (c), it is a rebuttable presumption that the person had 0.08 percent or more, by weight, of alcohol in his or her blood at the time of operation of a recreational vessel if the person had an alcohol concentration of 0.08 percent or more in his or her blood at the time of the performance of a chemical test within three hours after the operation.

(i) In any prosecution under subdivision (d), it is a rebuttable presumption that the person had 0.04 percent or more, by weight, of alcohol in his or her blood at the time of operation of a vessel other than a recreational vessel if the person had an alcohol concentration of 0.04 percent or more in his or her blood at the time of the performance of a chemical test within three hours after the operation.

(j) Upon the trial of any criminal action, or preliminary proceeding in a criminal action, arising out of acts alleged to have been committed by any person who was operating a vessel or manipulating water skis, an aquaplane, or a similar device while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage in violation of subdivision (b) or (f), the amount of alcohol in the person’s blood at the time of the test, as shown by a chemical test of that person’s blood, breath, or urine, shall give rise to the following presumptions affecting the burden of proof:

(1) If there was at that time less than 0.05 percent, by weight, of alcohol in the person’s blood, it shall be presumed that the person was not under the influence of an alcoholic beverage at the time of the alleged offense.

(2) If there was at that time 0.05 percent or more, but less than 0.08 percent, by weight, of alcohol in the person’s blood, that fact shall not give rise to any presumption that the person was or was not under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, but the fact may be considered with other competent evidence in determining whether the person was under the influence of an alcoholic beverage at the time of the alleged offense.

(3) If there was at that time 0.08 percent or more, by weight, of alcohol in the person’s blood, it shall be presumed that the person was under the influence of an alcoholic beverage at the time of the alleged offense.

(k) This section does not limit the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing upon the question whether the person ingested any alcoholic beverage or was under the influence of an alcoholic beverage at the time of the alleged offense.

(l) This section applies to foreign vessels using waters subject to state jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

655.05.

(a) No person shall operate a vessel other than a recreational vessel for 24 hours if the person is found by a peace officer to have an alcohol concentration of 0.01 percent or more in his or her blood. The peace officer shall order the person out of service for 24 hours.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1114, Sec. 6.   Section operative January 1, 1992, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

655.1.

(a) As used in this section, “mechanically propelled vessel” means any vessel actively propelled by machinery, whether or not the machinery is the principal source of propulsion.

(b) (1) A peace officer, having reasonable cause to believe that any person was operating a mechanically propelled vessel or manipulating any water skis, aquaplane, or similar device under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or any drug, or under the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and any drug, who lawfully arrests the person for any violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of Section 655, may request that person to submit to chemical testing of his or her blood, breath, or urine for the purpose of determining the drug or alcoholic content of
 the blood.

(2) The arrested person shall be advised of all of the following:

(A) A criminal complaint may be filed against him or her for operating a mechanically propelled vessel or manipulating any water skis, aquaplane, or similar device under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or any drug, or under the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and any drug.

(B) He or she has a right to refuse chemical testing.

(C) An officer has the authority to seek a search warrant compelling the arrested person to submit a blood sample as described in paragraph (16) of subdivision (a) of Section 1524 of the Penal Code.

(D) He or she does not have the right to have an attorney present before
 stating whether he or she will submit to the chemical testing, before deciding which chemical test or tests to take, or during the administration of the chemical test or tests chosen.

(c) If the person is lawfully arrested for operating a mechanically propelled vessel or manipulating any water skis, aquaplane, or similar device under the influence of an alcoholic beverage and submits to the chemical testing, the person has the choice of whether the chemical test shall be of his or her blood or breath and the person shall be advised by the arresting officer that he or she has that choice. If the person arrested either is incapable, or states that he or she is incapable, of completing the chosen test, the person shall submit to the remaining test. If a blood or breath test, or both, are unavailable, then subdivision (n) applies.

(d) If the person is lawfully arrested for operating a
 mechanically propelled vessel or manipulating any water skis, aquaplane, or similar device under the influence of any drug or the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and any drug and submits to the chemical testing, the person has the choice of whether the chemical test shall be of his or her blood, breath, or urine, and the officer shall advise the person that he or she has that choice.

(e) A person who chooses to submit to a breath test may also be requested to submit to a blood or urine test if the arresting officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person was operating a mechanically propelled vessel or manipulating any water skis, aquaplane, or similar device under the influence of any drug, or the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and any drug, and if the arresting officer has a clear indication that a blood or urine test will reveal evidence of the person being under the influence. The arresting officer shall
 state in his or her report the facts upon which that belief and that clear indication are based. The person shall have the choice of submitting to and completing a blood or urine test, and shall be advised by the arresting officer that he or she is requested to submit to an additional test, and that he or she may choose a test of either blood or urine. If the person arrested is either incapable, or states that he or she is incapable, of completing either chosen chemical test, the person shall submit to and complete the other remaining chemical test.

(f) (1) A person who chooses to submit to a breath test shall be advised before or after the breath test that the breath-testing equipment does not retain any sample of the breath, and that no breath sample will be available after the breath test which could be analyzed later by the person or any other person.

(2) The person shall also be advised that, because no breath sample is retained, the person will be given an opportunity to provide a blood or urine sample that will be retained at no cost to the person so that there will be something retained that may be subsequently analyzed for the alcoholic content of the person’s blood. If the person completes a breath test and wishes to provide a blood or urine sample to be retained, the sample shall be collected and retained in the same manner as if the person had chosen a blood or urine test initially.

(3) The person shall also be advised that the blood or urine sample may be tested by either party in any criminal prosecution. The failure of either party to perform this chemical test shall place no duty upon the opposing party to perform the chemical test nor affect the admissibility of any other evidence of the drug or alcoholic content of the blood of the person arrested.

(g) If the person is lawfully arrested for any offense allegedly committed in violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of Section 655, and because of the need for medical treatment, the person is first transported to a medical facility where it is not feasible to administer a particular chemical test of, or to obtain a particular sample of, the person’s blood, breath, or urine, the person has the choice of submitting to those chemical tests that are available at the facility to which that person has been transported. In this event, the arresting officer shall advise the person of those chemical tests that are available at the medical facility, and that the person’s choice is limited to those chemical tests that are available.

(h) Any person who is unconscious or otherwise in a condition rendering him or her incapable of refusal may be subjected to chemical testing of his
 or her blood, breath, or urine for the purpose of determining the drug or alcoholic content of the blood, whether or not the person is advised of the information specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(i) Any person who is afflicted with hemophilia is exempt from the blood test provided for in this section.

(j) Any person who is afflicted with a heart condition and is using an anticoagulant under the direction of a licensed physician and surgeon is exempt from the blood test provided for in this section.

(k) A person lawfully arrested for any offense allegedly committed while the person was operating a mechanically propelled vessel or manipulating any water skis, aquaplane, or similar device in violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of Section 655 may request the arresting officer to have a
 chemical test made of his or her blood or breath for the purpose of determining the drug or alcoholic content of the blood and, if so requested, the arresting officer shall have the chemical test performed. However, if a blood or breath test, or both, are unavailable, then subdivision (n) applies.

(l) Any chemical test of blood, breath, or urine to determine the percentage, by weight, of alcohol in the blood shall be performed in accordance with Section 23158 of the Vehicle Code.

(m) This section does not limit the authority of a peace officer to gather evidence from a person lawfully arrested for a violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of Section 655.

(n) If a blood or breath test is not available under paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) or under subdivision (k), the person shall submit to the
 remaining test in order to determine the percentage, by weight, of alcohol in the person’s blood. If both the blood and breath tests are unavailable, the person shall be deemed to have given his or her consent to chemical testing of his or her urine and shall submit to a urine test.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 98.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

655.2.

(a) Every owner, operator, or person in command of any vessel propelled by machinery is guilty of an infraction who uses it, or permits it to be used, at a speed in excess of five miles per hour in any portion of the following areas not otherwise regulated by local rules and regulations:

(1) Within 100 feet of any person who is engaged in the act of bathing. A person engaged in the sport of water skiing shall not be considered as engaged in the act of bathing for the purposes of this section.

(2) Within 200 feet of any of the following:

(A) A beach frequented by
 bathers.

(B) A swimming float, diving platform, or lifeline.

(C) A way or landing float to which boats are made fast or that is being used for the embarkation or discharge of passengers.

(b) This section does not apply to the following:

(1) Vessels, including personal water craft, clearly identifiable as lifeguard rescue
 vessels engaged in public safety activities.

(2) Public safety vessels engaged in direct law enforcement activities or public safety activities that are displaying the distinctive blue lights prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 652.5.

(3) Personal water craft, clearly identifiable as lifeguard rescue vessels or public
 safety vessels, operating within the surf zone.

(c) The vessels described in subdivision (b) are also exempt from any locally imposed speed regulation adopted pursuant to Section
 660, but shall be operated in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 655.7.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Clearly identifiable as lifeguard rescue vessel” means an authorized lifeguard water rescue vessel operated by or owned by a public agency.

(2) “Public safety activities” include public agency sanctioned patrolling, traffic control, assisting
 disabled vessels, salvage operations, firefighting, providing medical assistance, search and rescue, and training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 203, Sec. 2.   (AB 1682)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

655.3.

The department may adopt regulations to establish and maintain for the use of vessels and the equipment on vessels on the waters of this state rules of the road and pilot rules in conformity with those contained in the federal navigation laws or the navigation rules promulgated by the United States Coast Guard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 666, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

655.4.

(a) No person shall serve as a crew member on any charter boat while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, any drug, or the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and any drug.

(b) No person shall serve as a crew member on any charter boat while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, any drug, or under the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and any drug, and while so serving, do any act forbidden by law, or neglect any duty imposed by law in the use of the vessel, which act or neglect proximately causes bodily injury to any person other than himself or herself.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 910, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

655.5.

(a) Whenever a person convicted of any violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of Section 655 is found by the court to have willfully refused the request of a peace officer to submit to chemical testing of the blood, breath, or urine pursuant to Section 655.1, the court may impose enhanced penalties either by fine or imprisonment, or both, not to exceed the maximum of the penalties prescribed in Section 668.

(b) A willful refusal to submit to chemical testing pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be pled and proven.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1992.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 9) and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1114, Sec. 10.   Section operative January 1, 1992, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

655.6.

(a) It is an infraction for a person under the age of 21 years who has 0.01 percent or more, by weight, of alcohol in his or her blood to operate any motorized vessel or manipulate water skis, an aquaplane, or a similar device.

(b) A person may be found to be in violation of subdivision (a) if the person was, at the time of operating any motorized vessel or manipulating water skis, an aquaplane, or a similar device, under the age of 21 years and under the influence of, or affected by, an alcoholic beverage regardless of whether a chemical test was made to determine that person’s blood-alcohol concentration and if the trier of fact finds that the person had consumed an alcoholic beverage and was operating any motorized vessel or manipulating water skis, an aquaplane, or a similar device while having a concentration of 0.01 percent or more, by weight, of alcohol in his or her blood.

(c) Section 655.1 applies to violations of this section.

(d) A violation of this section is punishable by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100). A second violation occurring within one year of a prior violation which resulted in a conviction is punishable by a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200). A third or any subsequent conviction within a period of one year of two or more prior infractions which resulted in convictions is punishable by a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250). A person found to have committed a violation of this section shall be required to participate in an alcohol education or community service program as provided in Section 23502 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 1.2.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 85 of Ch. 118.)
-------------------------------------------

655.7.

(a) A person operating a personal watercraft equipped by the manufacturer with a lanyard-type engine cut-off switch shall attach the lanyard to themselves, their clothing, or their personal flotation device, as appropriate for the specific
 vessel, while operating on plane or above displacement speed.

(b) A person shall not operate a personal watercraft equipped by the manufacturer with an engine cut-off switch if the engine cut-off switch
 or engine throttle has been altered in any way that would impede or prevent the
 engine cut-off switch from operating in its intended manner.

(c) Every personal watercraft shall, at all times, be operated in a reasonable and prudent manner. Maneuvers that unreasonably or unnecessarily endanger life, limb, or property, including, but not limited to, jumping or attempting to jump the wake of another vessel within 100 feet of that other vessel, operating the personal watercraft toward any person or vessel in the water and turning sharply at close range so as to spray the vessel or person, or operating at a rate of speed and proximity to another vessel so that either operator is required to swerve at the last minute to avoid collision, is unsafe or reckless operation of a vessel.

(d) A person shall not operate a personal watercraft at any time between the hours from sunset to sunrise. This subdivision does not apply to
 marine patrol, harbor police, or emergency personnel in the performance of their duties.

(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a person operating a power-driven covered vessel shall not operate or authorize another person to operate the vessel on plane or above displacement speed if the engine cut-off switch or engine cut-off switch link is missing, disconnected, or not operating properly.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply if either of the following criteria is met:

(A) The main helm of the vessel is installed within an enclosed cabin.

(B) The vessel does not have an engine cut-off switch and is not required to have one pursuant to Section 4312 of Title 46 of the United States Code.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “covered vessel” means a vessel that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Is less than 26 feet overall in length.

(B) Is capable of developing 115 pounds or more of static thrust.

(C) Is either equipped with an engine cut-off switch or was built on or after December 4, 2019.

(f) This section does not apply to a performer who is engaged in a professional exhibition or to a person who is participating in a regatta, race, marine parade, tournament, exhibition, or other event sanctioned by the United States Coast Guard or authorized by a permit issued by the local entity having jurisdiction over the area where the event is held.

(g) Any violation of this section is an infraction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 15.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

656.

(a) It is the duty of the operator of a vessel involved in a collision, accident, or other casualty, so far as the operator can do so without serious danger to his or her own vessel, crew, and passengers, to render to other persons affected by the collision, accident, or other casualty that assistance that is practicable and necessary in order to save them from, or minimize any, danger caused by the collision, accident, or other casualty.

(b) Any person who complies with subdivision (a) or Section 656.1, 656.2, or 656.3 or who gratuitously and in good faith renders assistance at the scene of a vessel collision, accident, or other casualty without objection by any person assisted, shall
 not be held liable for any civil damages sought as a result of the rendering of assistance or for any act or omission in providing or arranging salvage, towage, medical treatment, or other assistance, if the assisting person has acted as an ordinary, reasonably prudent person would have acted under the same or similar circumstances.

(c) (1) An individual employee of a public entity engaged in rescue pursuant to this code shall not be a proper party defendant and shall be dismissed on motion, unless the employee has violated a statute other than a statute creating a general obligation to rescue or is guilty of oppression, fraud, malice, or the conscious disregard of the safety of others.

(2) The public entity employing such an individual shall be liable in civil damages if the individual employee has failed to act as a reasonably prudent person would have
 acted under the same or similar circumstances.

(3) If a public entity has given a reasonable printed, electronic, or verbal warning of the danger causing the distress that created the necessity for the rescue, and there has been a reasonable opportunity for the party in distress to receive the warning, the public entity is liable only for acts or omissions of its employee that were taken in a grossly negligent manner.

(d) The owner, operator, or other person who is on board a vessel involved in a casualty or accident shall report the casualty or accident in accordance with regulations adopted by the department. The department shall adopt regulations to maintain a uniform casualty and accident reporting system for vessels subject to this code in conformity with federal casualty and accident reporting regulations promulgated by the United States Coast Guard or any successor to those
 regulations. Consistent with Public Law 92-75 and the federal regulations contained in Part 173 of Title 33 of the Code of Federal Regulations, a peace officer or harbor police officer upon receiving an initial report of a casualty involving the death or disappearance of a person as a result of a boating accident, shall immediately forward the report, by quickest means available, to the department.

(1) A public agency that is under contract with the department to receive law enforcement grant funds from the department shall, pursuant to regulations adopted by the department, complete and submit to the department a report for any boating accident to which it responds or for which it receives a report.

(2) A public agency that has received any law enforcement grant funds from the department that does not submit an accident report as required under paragraph (1) shall be determined
 by the department to be ineligible to receive future grant funds for up to five fiscal years following the date of the failure to submit a report, except upon a showing of good cause by that public agency.

(3) The department shall use reasonable means to do both of the following:

(A) Obtain from a public agency any complete report required to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(B) Notify a public agency of the failure to submit a report required under paragraph (1) before taking action pursuant to paragraph (2).

(e) Neither the report required by this section nor any action taken by the department with regard to the report shall be referred to in any way, or be any evidence of negligence or due care of any party, at the trial of any action at law
 to recover damages.

(f) All required accident reports, and supplemental reports, shall be without prejudice to the individual so reporting and shall be for the confidential use of the department and any peace officer actually engaged in the enforcement of this chapter, except that the department shall disclose the names and addresses of persons involved in, or witnesses to, an accident, the registration numbers and descriptions of vessels involved, and the date, time, and location of an accident to any person who may have a proper interest in that information, including the operator involved or the legal guardian of that operator, the parent of a minor operator, the authorized representative of an operator, or any person injured, and the owners of vessels or property damaged, in the accident.

(g) This section applies to foreign vessels, military or public recreational-type
 vessels, vessels owned by a state or subdivision of a state, and ship’s lifeboats otherwise exempted from this chapter pursuant to Section 650.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 165, Sec. 1.   (SB 457)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

656.1.

The operator of any vessel involved in an accident in the waters of this state who knows or has reason to know that the accident resulted in damage to other property shall, if reasonable to do so under the circumstances, stop at the scene of the accident and shall do either of the following:

(a) Locate and notify the owner or person in charge of the damaged property of the name and address of the operator and owner of the vessel involved, and upon locating the owner or operator of any other vessel involved, or the owner or person in charge of any other property damaged, upon being requested, exhibit the vessel registration and furnish the current residence address of the vessel’s owner and operator to the other person.

(b) If the owner or person in charge of the damaged property or the owner or operator of any other vessel involved cannot be located, leave, in a conspicuous place on the property damaged or other vessel involved, a written notice giving the name and address of the operator and of the owner of the vessel involved and a statement of the circumstances of the accident, and, without unnecessary delay, notify the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the waterway or, if unknown, the sheriff of the county in which the accident occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 877, Sec. 3.5.)
-------------------------------------------

656.2.

In addition to the requirements of Section 656.1, the operator of any vessel involved in an accident in the waters of this state who knows or has reason to know that the accident resulted in injury to any person shall furnish his or her name, address, and the registration number of the vessel, and the name of the owner, to the person injured, or occupant of any other vessel involved, or shall furnish that information to any peace officer at the scene of the accident, and shall render to any injured person reasonable assistance, including transportation for medical treatment if required or requested by the injured person, so far as the operator can do so without serious danger to the vessel or passengers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 877, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

656.3.

In addition to the requirements of Sections 656.1 and 656.2, the operator of any vessel involved in an accident in the waters of this state who knows or has reason to know that the accident resulted in the death or disappearance of any person shall, after fulfilling the requirements of this division, and if there is no peace officer at the scene of the accident to whom to furnish the information required by Section 656.2, without delay, report the accident to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the waterway or, if unknown, the sheriff of the county in which the accident occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 877, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

656.4.

The department is authorized to develop a program of public information and research in the interest of reducing loss of life and property in the operation of vessels covered by this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 685.4 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 842.)
-------------------------------------------

657.

In accordance with any request duly made by an authorized official or agency of the United States, any information compiled or otherwise available to the department pursuant to Section 656 shall be transmitted to said official or agency of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------

658.

(a) No person shall operate a vessel on any waters for towing a person or persons on water skis, an aquaplane, or a similar device unless there is in the vessel a person at least 12 years of age, in addition to the operator, in a position to observe the progress of the persons being towed.

This subdivision does not apply to motorboats less than 16 feet in length actually operated by the person or persons being towed and so constructed as to be incapable of carrying the operator in or on the motorboat. The department may establish rules and regulations governing the operation of those watercraft, which rules and regulations shall provide the greatest possible safety of persons and vessels.

(b) No person shall operate a vessel on any waters of this state towing a person or persons on water skis, an aquaplane, or a similar device nor shall any person engage in water skiing, aquaplaning, or other similar activity at any time between the hours from sunset to sunrise, except that those hours do not apply to those waters of this state as to which prohibited hours for those activities are fixed by local ordinances, laws, or regulations enacted pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section do not apply to a performer engaged in a professional exhibition or a person or persons engaged in a regatta, vessel or water ski race, or other marine event authorized pursuant to Section 268. 

(d) No person shall operate or manipulate any vessel, towrope, or other device by which the direction or location of water skis, an aquaplane, or a similar device may be affected or controlled so as to cause the water skis, aquaplane, or similar device, or any person thereon, to collide with, or strike against, any object or person. This subdivision does not apply to collisions of two or more persons on water skis, aquaplanes, or similar devices being towed by the same vessel.

(e) No person shall operate water skis, an aquaplane, or a similar device so as to endanger the life, limb, or property of any person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 745, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

658.3.

(a) A person shall not use a recreational vessel unless all of the following requirements are met:

(1) There is at least one wearable personal flotation device on board
 the vessel for each person on the vessel.

(2) Each personal flotation device is used in accordance with the requirements on its approval label.

(3) If a personal flotation device’s approval label refers to an owner’s manual, then the personal flotation device is used in accordance with the requirements in its owner’s manual.

(b) A person shall not use a recreational vessel 16 feet or more in length unless one throwable personal flotation device is onboard in addition to the number of wearable personal flotation devices required by subdivision (a).

(c) A person shall not operate a recreational vessel underway with a child under 13 years of age
 onboard unless at least one of the following requirements is met:

(1) The child is wearing an appropriate personal flotation device that is approved by the United States Coast Guard.

(2) The child is below deck or in an enclosed cabin.

(d) A person on board a personal watercraft or a person being towed behind a vessel on water skis, an aquaplane, or similar device, except for an underwater maneuvering device intended for use by a submerged swimmer, shall wear a United States Coast Guard-approved wearable personal flotation device that is used in accordance with approval labels and manufacturer’s instructions. An underwater maneuvering device is a towed or self-powered apparatus that a person can pilot through diving, turning, and surfacing maneuvers that
 is designed for underwater use.
